Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-1204.04
Deputies; bond.

The deputy county attorney in all counties, except as otherwise provided in section 23-1204.05, shall file a bond in the same manner and for the same amount required of the county attorney and be removable at the pleasure of the county attorney.

Laws 1893, c. 2, § 1, p. 64;

Laws 1901, c. 8, § 1, p. 57;

R.S.1913, § 5599;

Laws 1917, c. 108, § 1, p. 278;

Laws 1919, c. 62, § 1, p. 169;

Laws 1921, c. 232, § 1, p. 830;

C.S.1922, § 4916;

Laws 1923, c. 41, § 1, p. 156;

Laws 1927, c. 116, § 2, p. 326;

C.S.1929, § 26-904;

Laws 1943, c. 90, § 14, p. 302;

R.S.1943, § 23-1204;

Laws 1947, c. 73, § 2, p. 233;

Laws 1947, c. 72, § 2, p. 230;

Laws 1947, c. 62, § 5, p. 200;

Laws 1949, c. 42, § 1(5), p. 144.

Elected county officials are required to give individual official bonds. Blanket bond is not sufficient. Foote v. County of Adams, 163 Neb. 406, 80 N.W.2d 179 (1956).